Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.05.010

Registered agent.

Each corporation must continuously maintain in this state a registered agent in accordance with Article 4 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2117; 2002 c 297 s 15; 1989 c 165 s 40.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.